process/tex2pdf/hyphen/hyph_la_VA.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
.a1scalp
.a1scrips
.a1scríps
.a1scálp
.ab1
.ab1b
.ab2eced
.ab2ecéd
.ab2ieg
.ab2ies.
.ab2iet
.ab2ita
.ab2iteba
.ab2itebá
.ab2itemus.
.ab2itemús.
.ab2iten
.ab2iter
.ab2ites.
.ab2itet
.ab2itimus.
.ab2itimús.
.ab2itit
.ab2itunt
.ab2itá
.ab2itéba
.ab2itémus.
.ab2itén
.ab2itér
.ab2ités.
.ab2itét
.ab2itímus.
.ab2itít
.ab2itúnt
.ab2iég
.ab2iés.
.ab2iét
.ab2oll
.ab2racadabra
.ab2racadabrá
.ab2racadábra
.ab2racádabra
.ab2rácadabra
.ab2s.
.ab2s1c
.ab2s1d
.ab2s1p
.ab2s1q
.ab2s1s
.ab2s1t
.ab2æt
.ab2éced
.ab2íeg
.ab2íes.
.ab2íet
.ab2íta
.ab2íteba
.ab2ítemus.
.ab2íten
.ab2íter
.ab2ítes.
.ab2ítet
.ab2ítimus.
.ab2ítit
.ab2ítunt
.ab2óll
.ab2ǽt
.ab3s2cind
.ab3s2ciss
.ab3s2cínd
.ab3s2císs
.ab3s2ta
.ab3s2tem.
.ab3s2temus.
.ab3s2temús.
.ab3s2tent.
.ab3s2tes.
.ab3s2tet.
.ab3s2tetis.
.ab3s2tetís.
.ab3s2to.
.ab3s2tá
.ab3s2tém.
.ab3s2témus.
.ab3s2tént.
.ab3s2tés.
.ab3s2tét.
.ab3s2tétis.
.ab3s2tó.
.ab4s3cissio
.ab4s3cissió
.ab4s3cissío
.ab4s3císsio
.ac1c
.ac1q
.ac1si.
.ac1sí.
.ac2cei
.ac2ceí
.ac2céi
.ad1
.ad2asi
.ad2así
.ad2eps.
.ad2ipa
.ad2ipe
.ad2ipi.
.ad2ipibus.
.ad2ipibús.
.ad2ipin
.ad2ipis.
.ad2ips.
.ad2ipum.
.ad2ipá
.ad2ipé
.ad2ipí.
.ad2ipíbus.
.ad2ipín
.ad2ipís.
.ad2ipúm.
.ad2or.
.ad2ore.
.ad2orea
.ad2oree.
.ad2orei
.ad2oreo
.ad2oreu
.ad2oreá
.ad2oreæ.
.ad2oreé.
.ad2oreí
.ad2oreó
.ad2oreú
.ad2oreǽ.
.ad2ori.
.ad2oria.
.ad2oriam.
.ad2oriarum.
.ad2oriarúm.
.ad2orias.
.ad2oribus.
.ad2oribús.
.ad2oriis.
.ad2oris.
.ad2oriá.
.ad2oriám.
.ad2oriárum.
.ad2oriás.
.ad2oriæ.
.ad2oriís.
.ad2oriǽ.
.ad2orum.
.ad2oré.
.ad2oréa
.ad2orée.
.ad2oréi
.ad2oréo
.ad2oréu
.ad2oréæ.
.ad2orí.
.ad2oría.
.ad2oríam.
.ad2oríarum.
.ad2orías.
.ad2oríbus.
.ad2oríis.
.ad2orís.
.ad2oríæ.
.ad2orúm.
.ad2ási
.ad2éps.
.ad2ípa
.ad2ípe
.ad2ípi.
.ad2ípibus.
.ad2ípin
.ad2ípis.
.ad2íps.
.ad2ípum.
.ad2ór.
.ad2óre.
.ad2órea
.ad2óree.
.ad2órei
.ad2óreo
.ad2óreu
.ad2óreæ.
.ad2óri.
.ad2ória.
.ad2óriam.
.ad2óriarum.
.ad2órias.
.ad2óribus.
.ad2óriis.
.ad2óris.
.ad2óriæ.
.ad2órum.
.af1f
.ag1g
.agres1t
.agrés1t
.al1l
.aliquantis1per.
.aliquantis1pér.
.aliquantís1per.
.aliquántis1per.
.aliqúantis1per.
.alter1uter.
.alter1utr
.alter1utér.
.alter1úter.
.alter1útr
.altius1cul
.altius1cúl
.altiús1cul
.altér1uter.
.altér1utr
.altíus1cul
.alu1mn
.alum2ne.
.alum2né.
.alíquantis1per.
.alú1mn
.alúm2ne.
.am1icia
.am1icibor.
.am1icibór.
.am1icie
.am1icim
.am1icio
.am1icir
.am1icit.
.am1icite.
.am1icitis.
.am1icito
.am1icitur.
.am1icité.
.am1icitís.
.am1icitó
.am1icitúr.
.am1iciunt
.am1iciá
.am1icié
.am1ició
.am1iciúnt
.am1ict
.am1icue
.am1icui
.am1iculat
.am1iculát
.am1icué
.am1icuí
.am1icía
.am1icíbor.
.am1icíe
.am1icím
.am1icío
.am1icír
.am1icít.
.am1icíte.
.am1icítis.
.am1icíto
.am1icítur.
.am1icíunt
.am1icúe
.am1icúi
.am1icúlat
.am1ix
.am1m
.am1ícia
.am1ícibor.
.am1ície
.am1ícim
.am1ício
.am1ícir
.am1ícit.
.am1ícite.
.am1ícitis.
.am1ícito
.am1ícitur.
.am1íciunt
.am1íct
.am1ícue
.am1ícui
.am1ículat
.am1íx
.am2icircul
.am2icircúl
.am2icírcul
.am2ícircul
.amb1aded
.amb1ades
.amb1adéd
.amb1adés
.amb1ag
.amb1axi
.amb1axí
.amb1ed
.amb1egn
.amb1es
.amb1i.
.amb1iamini.
.amb1iaminí.
.amb1iamu
.amb1iamíni.
.amb1iamú
.amb1iant
.amb1iar
.amb1ias.
.amb1iat
.amb1iba
.amb1ibunt
.amb1ibá
.amb1ibúnt
.amb1ieba
.amb1iebá
.amb1iect
.amb1iem
.amb1iend
.amb1iens.
.amb1ient.
.amb1ienti
.amb1ientur.
.amb1ientí
.amb1ientúr.
.amb1ier
.amb1ies.
.amb1iet
.amb1ig
.amb1ii
.amb1imini.
.amb1iminí.
.amb1imu
.amb1imíni.
.amb1imú
.amb1io.
.amb1ior.
.amb1ir
.amb1is.
.amb1iss
.amb1it
.amb1iunt
.amb1iver
.amb1ivi.
.amb1ivimus.
.amb1ivimús.
.amb1ivis
.amb1ivit.
.amb1ivér
.amb1iví.
.amb1ivímus.
.amb1ivís
.amb1ivít.
.amb1iámini.
.amb1iámu
.amb1iánt
.amb1iár
.amb1iás.
.amb1iát
.amb1iéba
.amb1iéct
.amb1iém
.amb1iénd
.amb1iéns.
.amb1iént.
.amb1iénti
.amb1iéntur.
.amb1iér
.amb1iés.
.amb1iét
.amb1ií
.amb1ió.
.amb1iór.
.amb1iúnt
.amb1ul
.amb1ur
.amb1urb
.amb1uss
.amb1ust
.amb1áded
.amb1ádes
.amb1ág
.amb1áxi
.amb1éd
.amb1égn
.amb1és
.amb1í.
.amb1íamini.
.amb1íamu
.amb1íant
.amb1íar
.amb1ías.
.amb1íat
.amb1íba
.amb1íbunt
.amb1íeba
.amb1íect
.amb1íem
.amb1íend
.amb1íens.
.amb1íent.
.amb1íenti
.amb1íentur.
.amb1íer
.amb1íes.
.amb1íet
.amb1íg
.amb1íi
.amb1ímini.
.amb1ímu
.amb1ío.
.amb1íor.
.amb1ír
.amb1ís.
.amb1íss
.amb1ít
.amb1íunt
.amb1íver
.amb1ívi.
.amb1ívimus.
.amb1ívis
.amb1ívit.
.amb1úl
.amb1úr
.amb1úrb
.amb1úss
.amb1úst
.amb2igen
.amb2igén
.amb2ígen
.amb3igend
.amb3igens.
.amb3igent
.amb3igénd
.amb3igéns.
.amb3igént
.amb3ígend
.amb3ígens.
.amb3ígent
.amplius1cul
.amplius1cúl
.ampliús1cul
.amplíus1cul
.an1n
.angus1t
.angús1t
.anim1adver
.anim1advor
.anim1advér
.anim1advór
.anim1ádver
.anim1ádvor
.anim1æqu
.anim1æqú
.anim1ǽqu
.ante1
.ant1ea.
.ant1eat.
.ant1eá.
.ant1eát.
.ant1ibo.
.ant1ibó.
.ant1isse.
.ant1issent.
.ant1issé.
.ant1issént.
.anté1
.ant1éa.
.ant1éat.
.ant1íbo.
.ant1ísse.
.ant1íssent.
.ante2mn
.ante2nn
.ante2rior
.ante2riór
.ante2ríor
.ante2s.
.antid1ea.
.antid1eo.
.antid1eá.
.antid1eó.
.antid1hac.
.antid1hác.
.antid1it.
.antid1éa.
.antid1éo.
.antid1ít.
.anté2mn
.anté2nn
.anté2rior
.anté2s.
.antíd1ea.
.antíd1eo.
.antíd1hac.
.antíd1it.
.aním1adver
.aním1advor
.aním1æqu
.ap1p
.ap1sen
.ap1sum
.ap1sén
.ap1súm
.aps1tin
.aps1tín
.ar1r
.arbus1cul
.arbus1cúl
.arbus1t
.arbús1cul
.arbús1t
.armi1custo
.armi1custó
.armi1cústo
.armi1lustr
.armi1lústr
.armí1custo
.armí1lustr
.as1pell
.as1port
.as1pul
.as1péll
.as1pórt
.as1púl
.as1s
.at1av
.at1t
.at1áv
.auctius1cul
.auctius1cúl
.auctiús1cul
.auctíus1cul
.augus1t
.augús1t
.auri1vestri
.auri1vestrí
.auri1véstri
.aurí1vestri
.aus1cul
.aus1cult
.aus1cúl
.aus1cúlt
.aúctius1cul
.aúgus1t
.aúri1vestri
.aús1cul
.aús1cult
.barbas1cul
.barbas1cúl
.barbás1cul
.bi1fest
.bi1fést
.bi1lustr
.bi1lústr
.bi1menstr
.bi1mestr
.bi1ménstr
.bi1méstr
.bic1ess
.bic1éss
.bis1quadrat
.bis1quadrát
.bis1quin
.bis1quádrat
.bis1quín
.bis1qúadrat
.bis1qúin
.bonus1cul
.bonus1cúl
.bonús1cul
.bus1t
.bus2trophedon.
.bus2trophedón.
.bus2trophédon.
.bus2tróphedon.
.bárbas1cul
.bí1fest
.bí1lustr
.bí1menstr
.bí1mestr
.bíc1ess
.bís1quadrat
.bís1quin
.bónus1cul
.bús1t
.bús2trophedon.
.calu1mni
.calu1mní
.calú1mni
.camp1sera
.camp1seri
.camp1sero.
.camp1serunt.
.camp1será
.camp1serí
.camp1seró.
.camp1serúnt.
.camp1si
.camp1séra
.camp1séri
.camp1séro.
.camp1sérunt.
.camp1sí
.camp2seris.
.camp2serís.
.camp2séris.
.campes1t
.campés1t
.cap1simus.
.cap1simús.
.cap1sit.
.cap1símus.
.cap1sít.
.carp1s
.cas1c
.cas1t
.cas1tell
.cas1tr
.cas1téll
.cas2cant
.cas2cánt
.cas2tabal
.cas2tabál
.cas2tal
.cas2tan
.cas2then
.cas2thén
.cas2tulo
.cas2tuló
.cas2tábal
.cas2tál
.cas2tán
.cas2tæc
.cas2túlo
.cas2tǽc
.celerius1cul
.celerius1cúl
.celeriús1cul
.celeríus1cul
.celérius1cul
.cent1uss
.cent1úss
.cep1sit.
.cep1so.
.cep1sít.
.cep1só.
.cerp1s
.cinis1cul
.cinis1cúl
.cinís1cul
.circu1e
.circu1i
.circu1é
.circu1í
.circum1
.circun1
.circú1e
.circú1i
.circúm1
.circún1
.cis1alpic
.cis1alpin
.cis1alpíc
.cis1alpín
.cis1montan
.cis1montán
.cis1móntan
.cis1pell
.cis1péll
.cis1rhenan
.cis1rhenán
.cis1rhénan
.cis1tiber
.cis1tibér
.cis1tíber
.cis1álpic
.cis1álpin
.clandes1tin
.clandes1tín
.clandés1tin
.claus1tell
.claus1tr
.claus1téll
.claús1tell
.claús1tr
.clep1ser
.clep1si
.clep1sér
.clep1sí
.clos1tell
.clos1tr
.clos1téll
.clus1tell
.clus1tr
.clus1téll
.clándes1tin
.cláus1tell
.cláus1tr
.clép1ser
.clép1si
.clós1tell
.clós1tr
.clús1tell
.clús1tr
.co1a
.co1e
.co1gn
.co1h
.co1i
.co1o
.co1u
.co1á
.co1æ
.co1é
.co1í
.co1ó
.co1ú
.co1ǽ
.co3ibe/ó=h,2,1
.co3ibit/ó=h,2,1
.co3ibu/ó=h,2,1
.co3ibé/o=h,2,1
.co3ibít/o=h,2,1
.co3ibú/o=h,2,1
.co3íbe/o=h,2,1
.co3íbit/o=h,2,1
.co3íbu/o=h,2,1
.col1l
.colu1mn
.colú1mn
.com1b
.com1ed
.com1es
.com1es.
.com1it
.com1m
.com1p
.com1éd
.com1és
.com1és.
.com1ít
.com2bret
.com2brét
.com2itas.
.com2itate.
.com2itatem.
.com2itates.
.com2itati.
.com2itatis.
.com2itaté.
.com2itatém.
.com2itatés.
.com2itatí.
.com2itatís.
.com2iter.
.com2itás.
.com2itáte.
.com2itátem.
.com2itátes.
.com2itáti.
.com2itátis.
.com2itér.
.com2p.
.com2p1si
.com2p1sí
.com2perer
.com2peria
.com2perie
.com2perim
.com2perio
.com2perir
.com2peris
.com2perit.
.com2perite.
.com2peritis.
.com2perito.
.com2peritor.
.com2peritote.
.com2peritoté.
.com2peritur.
.com2perité.
.com2peritís.
.com2peritó.
.com2peritór.
.com2peritóte.
.com2peritúr.
.com2periu
.com2periá
.com2perié
.com2perió
.com2periú
.com2perui
.com2peruí
.com2perér
.com2pería
.com2períe
.com2perím
.com2perío
.com2perír
.com2perís
.com2perít.
.com2períte.
.com2perítis.
.com2períto.
.com2perítor.
.com2perítote.
.com2perítur.
.com2períu
.com2perúi
.com2pse
.com2psé
.com2pt
.com2pérer
.com2péria
.com2périe
.com2périm
.com2pério
.com2périr
.com2péris
.com2périt.
.com2périte.
.com2péritis.
.com2périto.
.com2péritor.
.com2péritote.
.com2péritur.
.com2périu
.com2pérui
.com2ítas.
.com2ítate.
.com2ítatem.
.com2ítates.
.com2ítati.
.com2ítatis.
.com2íter.
.com3perier
.com3periér
.com3períer
.com3périer
.com4periere.
.com4perieris.
.com4perieré.
.com4perierís.
.com4periére.
.com4periéris.
.com4períere.
.com4períeris.
.com4périere.
.com4périeris.
.comes1t
.comes2t.
.comp1ser
.comp1sér
.comp2sissume.
.comp2sissumé.
.comp2sissúme.
.comp2síssume.
.comés1t
.comés2t.
.con1angust
.con1angúst
.con1audit
.con1audít
.con1aúdit
.con1b
.con1c
.con1d
.con1f
.con1g
.con1iac
.con1ic
.con1iec
.con1ier
.con1iex
.con1iic
.con1ire.
.con1iré.
.con1iucund
.con1iucúnd
.con1iudic
.con1iudíc
.con1iug
.con1iunct
.con1iung
.con1iunx
.con1iunx.
.con1iur
.con1iux.
.con1iác
.con1iéc
.con1iér
.con1iéx
.con1iíc
.con1iúcund
.con1iúdic
.con1iúg
.con1iúnct
.con1iúng
.con1iúnx
.con1iúnx.
.con1iúr
.con1iúx.
.con1l
.con1m
.con1n
.con1p
.con1q
.con1r
.con1s
.con1t
.con1v
.con1ángust
.con1áudit
.con1íac
.con1íc
.con1íec
.con1íer
.con1íex
.con1íic
.con1íre.
.con1íucund
.con1íudic
.con1íug
.con1íunct
.con1íung
.con1íunx
.con1íunx.
.con1íur
.con1íux.
.con2perer
.con2peria
.con2perie
.con2perim
.con2perio
.con2perir
.con2peris
.con2perit.
.con2perite.
.con2peritis.
.con2perito.
.con2peritor.
.con2peritote.
.con2peritoté.
.con2peritur.
.con2perité.
.con2peritís.
.con2peritó.
.con2peritór.
.con2peritóte.
.con2peritúr.
.con2periu
.con2periá
.con2perié
.con2perió
.con2periú
.con2perui
.con2peruí
.con2perér
.con2pería
.con2períe
.con2perím
.con2perío
.con2perír
.con2perís
.con2perít.
.con2períte.
.con2perítis.
.con2períto.
.con2perítor.
.con2perítote.
.con2perítur.
.con2períu
.con2perúi
.con2pérer
.con2péria
.con2périe
.con2périm
.con2pério
.con2périr
.con2péris
.con2périt.
.con2périte.
.con2péritis.
.con2périto.
.con2péritor.
.con2péritote.
.con2péritur.
.con2périu
.con2pérui
.con3perier
.con3periér
.con3períer
.con3périer
.con4periere.
.con4perieris.
.con4perieré.
.con4perierís.
.con4periére.
.con4periéris.
.con4períere.
.con4períeris.
.con4périere.
.con4périeris.
.confœdus1t
.confœdús1t
.contemp1s
.contra1i
.contra1scrip
.contra1scríp
.contra1í
.contrá1i
.contrá1scrip
.contémp1s
.cor1r
.corpus1cul
.corpus1cúl
.corpús1cul
.cras1tin
.cras1tín
.crepus1cul
.crepus1cúl
.crepús1cul
.cris1t
.crus1cul
.crus1cúl
.crus1t
.crus2tumer
.crus2tumi
.crus2tumér
.crus2tumí
.crus2túmer
.crus2túmi
.crás1tin
.crépus1cul
.crís1t
.crús1cul
.crús1t
.crús2tumer
.crús2tumi
.cui1cui.
.cui1cuí.
.cui1cúi.
.cui1dam.
.cui1dám.
.cui1quam.
.cui1quám.
.cui1qúam.
.cuius1ce.
.cuius1cuius.
.cuius1cuiús.
.cuius1cuíus.
.cuius1cé.
.cuius1cúius.
.cuiús1ce.
.cuiús1cuius.
.cum1alter.
.cum1altér.
.cum1ulter.
.cum1ultér.
.cum1álter.
.cum1últer.
.cuí1cui.
.cuí1dam.
.cuí1quam.
.cuíus1ce.
.cuíus1cuius.
.cálu1mni
.cámp1sera
.cámp1seri
.cámp1sero.
.cámp1serunt.
.cámp1si
.cámp2seris.
.cámpes1t
.cáp1simus.
.cáp1sit.
.cárp1s
.cás1c
.cás1t
.cás1tell
.cás1tr
.cás2cant
.cás2tabal
.cás2tal
.cás2tan
.cás2then
.cás2tulo
.cás2tæc
.cæles1t
.cælés1t
.cæs1t
.célerius1cul
.cént1uss
.cép1sit.
.cép1so.
.cérp1s
.cínis1cul
.círcu1e
.círcu1i
.círcum1
.círcun1
.cís1alpic
.cís1alpin
.cís1montan
.cís1pell
.cís1rhenan
.cís1tiber
.có1a
.có1e
.có1gn
.có1h
.có1i
.có1o
.có1u
.có1æ
.có3ibe/o=h,2,1
.có3ibit/o=h,2,1
.có3ibu/o=h,2,1
.cól1l
.cólu1mn
.cóm1b
.cóm1ed
.cóm1es
.cóm1es.
.cóm1it
.cóm1m
.cóm1p
.cóm2bret
.cóm2itas.
